Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-450
License; disciplinary actions; considerations.

(1) In determining what type of disciplinary action to impose, the department shall consider:

(a) The gravity of the violation, including the probability that death or serious physical or mental harm will result, the severity of the actual or potential harm, and the extent to which the provisions of applicable statutes, rules, and regulations were violated;

(b) The reasonableness of the diligence exercised by the health care facility or health care service in identifying or correcting the violation;

(c) Any previous violations committed by the facility or service; and

(d) The financial benefit to the facility or service of committing or continuing the violation.

(2) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which set forth specific violations which will result in a particular disciplinary action, including the use of scope and severity determinations.

(3) If the licensee fails to correct a violation or to comply with a particular type of disciplinary action, the department may take additional disciplinary action as described in section 71-449.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 50.